California statutes. Labor Code
(3) All employees of that employer whose hours are regulated by this chapter and who have become employed by that employer within 24 hours of the time the election is commenced are eligible to vote in the election.

(4) The policy shall be effective for the period specified therein, not exceeding 12 months.

(5) No later than 14 days prior to the date set for an election, the employer shall do all of the following:

(A) Provide a written notice to the affected employees that describes the effects the proposed work schedule would have on the employees’ wages, hours, and benefits, and the employees’ rights under this chapter, including the right to request that the election be conducted by a neutral third party pursuant to this section, and to file a complaint against the employer pursuant to this chapter.

(B) Provide a written statement to the affected employees, prepared by a neutral source knowledgeable in health and safety matters and unaffiliated with the employer, that explains any health and safety considerations of extended work shifts.

(C) Hold informational meetings for the affected employees on each shift during the regular working hours of the affected employees. At each of these meetings, the employer shall explain the effect of the proposed policy on the hours and compensation of the employees. Written notice of the time, date, place, and purpose of these informational meetings shall be conspicuously posted in at least three locations throughout the mine site for at least seven consecutive days before the date of the meetings. Written notice of the time, date, place, and purpose of the election shall be posted in the same manner and for the same period. Failure to comply with the procedural requirements of this paragraph shall void the results of the election for purposes of this section.

(6) Any employer that establishes a regular scheduled workday pursuant to this subdivision shall make a reasonable attempt to place an employee, who was eligible to participate in the election that authorized an extended workday schedule and who is unable or unwilling to work the extended schedule, in an alternative work assignment that the employee is capable of performing. An employer shall not be required to offer an alternative work assignment to an employee if an alternative work assignment that the employee is capable of performing is not available or if the employee commenced his or her employment after the election.

(c) On the day a scheduled change of shift takes effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 903, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

751.

In the case of an emergency where life or property is in imminent danger, the work shift may be extended during the continuance of the emergency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 903, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

751.5.

Where emergency repairs to, or maintenance or replacement of, machinery or equipment are necessary for the continuous operation thereof, the hours that an employee may be engaged in performing the emergency repairs, maintenance, or replacement, may, during the pendency of the emergency, exceed the period specified in Section 750.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 903, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

751.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 750, the period of employment may exceed eight hours in any 24-hour period if the employee is paid at the overtime rate of pay for hours worked in excess of that employee’s regularly scheduled shift and for hours worked in excess of 40 hours in a seven-day period. Unless regularly scheduled shifts are established pursuant to Section 750.5, overtime rates of pay shall be paid for all hours worked in excess of those hours prescribed by Section 750 as the maximum allowable hours of employment.

(b) All work performed in any workday in excess of the scheduled hours established by an agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 750.5 up to and including 12 hours, or in excess of 40 hours in a workweek, shall be compensated at one and one-half times the employee’s regular rate of compensation. All work performed in any workday in excess of 12 hours shall be compensated at double the employee’s regular rate of compensation. No hours that are compensated at either one and one-half times, or double, the regular rate of compensation shall be included in determining the number of hours an employee has worked in a workweek for purposes of computing premium compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 903, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

752.

(a) Any affected employee, or his or her representative, may file a complaint with the Labor Commissioner concerning the conduct of an election pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 750.5 within 14 days following notice of the outcome of the election. The Labor Commissioner shall investigate the complaint and shall invalidate the election if the commissioner finds that misconduct has occurred that could have affected the outcome of the election. If the election is invalidated, the commissioner shall prohibit the employer from conducting a similar election for a period of 12 months.

(b) Any employer, or representative of an employer, that violates Section 750 or 751.8 shall be subject to a civil penalty as follows:

(1) For any initial violation that is intentionally committed, one hundred dollars ($100) for each affected employee for each violation for each pay period.

(2) For each subsequent violation for the same offense, two hundred dollars ($200) for each violation for each affected employee for each pay period, regardless of whether the initial violation is intentionally committed.

(c) If the Labor Commissioner determines that an employer has failed to comply with paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 750.5, the Labor Commissioner shall order the employer to comply. The order, in appropriate cases, shall include provisions for reinstatement and backpay.

(d) An employer shall not retaliate in any way against an employee for exercising any right pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 329, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

752.5.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 903, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Lumber Industries [800. - 801.]

800.

Every person operating a sawmill, shakemill, shinglemill, logging camp, planing mill, veneer mill, plywood plant or any other type of plant or mill which processes or manufactures any lumber, lumber products or allied wood products, in this State shall allow his employees a period of not less than one-half hour for the midday meal, between the third and fifth hours of each day’s shift after the start thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

Any person, or agent or officer thereof who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than four hundred dollars ($400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 195.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Pharmacies [850. - 856.]

850.

No person employed to sell at retail drugs and medicines or to compound physicians’ prescriptions shall perform any work in any store, dispensary, pharmacy, laboratory, or office for more than an average of nine hours per day, or for more than 108 hours in any two consecutive weeks or for more than 12 days in any two consecutive weeks, except that any registered pharmacist may be so employed and may perform such work for the full period of time permitted by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 435.)
-------------------------------------------

851.

No person employing another person to sell at retail drugs and medicines or to compound physicians’ prescriptions shall require or permit such employee to perform any work in any store, dispensary, pharmacy, laboratory, or office for more than an average of nine hours per day, or for more than 108 hours in any two consecutive weeks or for more than 12 days in any two consecutive weeks, except that any registered pharmacist may be so employed and may perform such work for the full period of time permitted by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 436.)
-------------------------------------------

851.5.

Except on Sundays and holidays, and except for a period of time for meals, not to exceed one hour in length, the hours of work permitted per day by this chapter shall be consecutive. This section does not apply to hospitals employing only one person to compound physicians’ prescriptions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

852.

The employer shall apportion the periods of rest to be taken by an employee so that the employee will have one complete day of rest during each week.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 567.)
-------------------------------------------

853.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than forty dollars ($40) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or by imprisonment for not exceeding 60 days, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 196.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

854.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply in any case of emergency. The word “emergency” shall be construed as being accident, death, sickness or epidemic.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

855.

The provisions of this chapter are enacted as a measure for the protection of the public health.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

856.

The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Agriculture [857. - 864.]

857.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Phase-In Overtime for Agricultural Workers Act of 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

858.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Agricultural employees engage in back-breaking work every day.

(b) Few occupations in today’s America are as physically demanding and exhausting as agricultural work.

(c) In 1938, the United States Congress enacted the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq.), which excluded agricultural workers from wage protections and overtime compensation requirements.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact the Phase-In Overtime
 for Agricultural Workers Act of 2016 to provide any person employed in an agricultural occupation in California, as defined in Order No. 14-2001 of the Industrial Welfare Commission (revised 07-2014) with an opportunity to earn overtime compensation under the same standards as millions of other Californians.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

859.

For purposes of this chapter, “employed in an agricultural occupation” has the same meaning as in Order No.14-2001 of the Industrial Welfare Commission (revised 07-2014).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

860.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 500):

(a) (1) Commencing January 1, 2019, except as provided in paragraph (2), any person employed in an agricultural occupation shall not be employed more than nine and one-half hours in any one workday or work in excess of 55 hours in any one workweek, unless the employee receives one and one-half
 times that employee’s regular rate of pay for all hours worked over nine and one-half hours in any workday or over 55 hours in any workweek.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to an employer who employs 25 or fewer employees commencing January 1, 2022.

(b) (1) Commencing January 1, 2020, except as provided in paragraph (2), any person employed in an agricultural occupation shall not be employed more than
 nine hours in any one workday or work in excess of 50 hours in any one workweek, unless the employee receives one and one-half times that employee’s regular rate of pay for all hours worked over nine hours in any workday or over 50 hours in any workweek.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to an employer who employs 25 or fewer employees commencing January 1, 2023.

(c) (1) Commencing January 1, 2021, except as provided in
 paragraph (2), any person employed in an agricultural occupation shall not be employed more than eight and one-half hours in any one workday or work in excess of 45 hours in any one workweek, unless the employee receives one and one-half times that employee’s regular rate of pay for all hours worked over eight and one-half hours in any workday or over 45 hours in any workweek.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to an employer who employs 25 or fewer employees commencing January 1, 2024.

(d) (1) Commencing January 1, 2022,
 except as provided in paragraph (2), any person employed in an agricultural occupation shall not be employed more than eight hours in any one workday or work in excess of 40 hours in any one workweek, unless the employee receives one and one-half times that employee’s regular rate of pay for all hours worked over eight hours in any workday or over 40 hours in any workweek.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to an employer who employs 25 or fewer employees commencing January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

861.

Except as set forth in Section 860 and subdivision (a) of Section 862, all other provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 500) regarding compensation for overtime work shall apply to workers in an agricultural occupation commencing January 1, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

862.

(a) Beginning January 1, 2022, except as provided in subdivision (c), and consistent with Section 510, any work performed by a person, employed in an agricultural occupation, in excess of 12 hours in one day shall be compensated at the rate of no less than twice the employee’s regular rate of pay.

(b) Consistent with Section 861, notwithstanding subdivision (a) or Section 863, the other provisions of Section 510 shall be applicable to workers in an agricultural occupation commencing January 1, 2019.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall apply to an employer who employs 25 or fewer employees commencing January 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

863.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 860 or 862, the Governor may temporarily suspend scheduled phase in of the overtime requirements set forth in Section 860, or subdivision (a) of Section 862 only if the Governor suspends scheduled minimum wage increases pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of, and subparagraph (B) of, paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 1182.12.

(b) If the Governor makes a final determination to temporarily suspend scheduled phase in of the overtime requirements set
 forth in Section 860 or subdivision (a) of Section 862 for the following year, all implementation dates applicable to Section 860 and subdivision (a) of Section 862 that are suspended subsequent to the September 1 final determination date, consistent with clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of, and subparagraph (B) of, paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 1182.12, shall be postponed by an additional year, but the full implementation of the overtime requirements set forth in Section 860 or subdivision (a) of Section 862 shall in no event be later than January 1, 2022. The Governor’s temporary suspension under this section shall be by proclamation.

(c) The Governor’s authority to suspend the scheduled overtime requirements under this section shall end upon the phase in of the overtime requirements contained in subdivision (d) of Section
 860, the phase in of the overtime requirements contained in subdivision (c) of Section 862, or January 1, 2025, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

864.

The Department of Industrial Relations shall update Wage Order No. 14-2001 to be consistent with this chapter, except that any existing provision in Wage Order 14-2001 providing greater protections or benefits to agricultural employees shall continue in full force and effect, notwithstanding any provision of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   (AB 1066)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Emergency Ambulance Services [880. - 890.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title [880. - 880.]

880.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Emergency Ambulance Employee Safety and Preparedness Act.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Findings and Declarations [881. - 881.]

881.

The people of the State of California find and declare the following:

(a) California has the nation’s largest population, third largest landmass, and is prone to natural disasters such as earthquakes, wildfires, and floods. These circumstances demand a well-trained emergency ambulance workforce.

(b) In California, private companies provide the primary emergency medical technician (EMT) and paramedic services for 74 percent of state residents. Unfortunately, catastrophes like natural disasters, active shooters, and mass casualty incidents occur far too frequently throughout the state and nation. Like all other first responders, emergency ambulance employees such as EMTs and paramedics must be adequately
 trained and available to respond to all types of crises and pleas for help.

(c) Private companies that employ emergency ambulance employees such as EMTs and paramedics should be required to provide compensated yearly training to prepare them to handle active shooter and mass casualty incidents, in addition to natural disasters.

(d) It takes a special type of person to be an emergency ambulance employee like an EMT or paramedic dedicated to serve, protect, and provide lifesaving services for their fellow neighbors around the clock. Emergency ambulance employees such as EMTs and paramedics often witness traumatic events. Employers should provide mental health services to emergency ambulance employees.

(e) Emergency ambulance employees such as EMTs and paramedics work hard and can be called into action at any time
 during their work shift to provide lifesaving care. Therefore, it is important that they receive adequate meal and rest time to remain at their peak performance.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Statement of Purpose [882. - 882.]

882.

The purpose of the Emergency Ambulance Employee Safety and Preparedness Act is to enhance public health and safety by ensuring that emergency ambulance employees such as EMTs and paramedics receive adequate training, meal and rest time, and mental health benefits and are available to respond to 911 emergency-type requests for medical assistance at all times.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Emergency Ambulance Employee Safety and Preparedness [883. - 889.]

883.

Training.

(a) In addition to other minimum employment qualifications and certifications, every emergency ambulance employee shall annually receive employer-paid training in each of the following areas:

(1) Responding to active shooter and mass casualty incidents.

(2) Responding to natural disasters.

(3) Preventing violence against emergency ambulance employees and patients.

(b) The training required by subdivision (a) shall be provided free of charge to emergency ambulance employees. Emergency ambulance
 employees shall be compensated at their regular hourly rate of pay while participating in training required by subdivision (a).

(c) The training required to be provided pursuant to this section shall be generally comparable in content, scope, and quality to courses offered by the Federal Emergency Management Agency’s Emergency Management Institute or National Training and Education Division, or both.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

884.

Mental Health.

(a) Every emergency ambulance employee shall receive employer-paid mental health and wellness education within 30 days of being hired and shall receive employer-paid mental health and wellness education each calendar year thereafter. Mental health and wellness education shall inform emergency ambulance employees of available mental health treatments and support services and provide general information regarding common mental health illnesses.

(b) Every emergency ambulance employee shall be entitled to employer-paid mental health services through an employee assistance program (EAP). The EAP coverage shall provide up to 10 mental health treatments per issue, per calendar year.

(c) Every emergency ambulance employee that qualifies for or is eligible to receive employer-provided health insurance shall have access to health insurance plans that offer long-term mental health treatment services.

(d) For purposes of this section, “issue” means episodes of mental health conditions such as stress, depression, grief, loss, relationship struggles, substance abuse, parenting challenges, and other mental health conditions as described within the EAP.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

885.

Meal and Rest Periods.

(a) All emergency ambulance employees are hereby entitled to meal and rest periods as prescribed elsewhere by the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(b) Emergency ambulance employees shall be compensated at their regular hourly rate of pay during meal and rest periods.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

886.

Staffing for Meal Periods.

(a) (1) An emergency ambulance provider shall not require an emergency ambulance employee to take a meal period during the first or last hour of a work shift and must allow an emergency ambulance employee to space multiple meal periods during a work shift at least two hours apart.

(2) An emergency ambulance provider shall manage staffing at levels sufficient to provide enough inactivity in a work shift for emergency ambulance employees to meet the requirements of this subdivision.

(b) Any meal period that does not comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not be counted towards the
 meal periods an employee is entitled to during his or her work shift.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

887.

Communication to Protect Public Health and Safety.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary:

(a) In order to maximize protection of public health and safety, emergency ambulance employees shall remain reachable by a portable communications device throughout the entirety of each work shift.

(b) If an emergency ambulance employee is contacted during a meal or rest period, that particular meal or rest period shall not be counted towards the meal and rest periods the employee is entitled to during his or her work shift.

(c) If an emergency ambulance employee is not contacted during a meal
 or rest period, that particular meal or rest period shall be counted towards the meal and rest periods the employee is entitled to during his or her work shift.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

888.

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, all of the following definitions apply:

(a) “Emergency ambulance employee” means a person who meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Is an emergency medical technician (EMT), dispatcher, paramedic, or other licensed or certified ambulance transport personnel who contributes to the delivery of ambulance services.

(2) Is employed by an emergency ambulance provider.

(b) “Emergency ambulance provider” means an employer that provides ambulance services, but not including the state, or any
 political subdivision thereof, in its capacity as the direct employer of a person meeting the description contained in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) “Contacted” means receiving a message or directive over a portable communications device that requires a response. A bare requirement to carry a portable communications device and remain reachable does not constitute being “contacted.”

(d) “Portable communications device” means a pager, radio, station alert box, intercom, cellular telephone, or other communications method.

(e) “Work shift” means designated hours of work by an emergency ambulance employee, with a designated beginning time and quitting time, including any periods for meals or rest.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

889.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Sections 887 and 888 are declaratory of, and do not alter or amend, existing California law and shall apply to any and all actions pending on, or commenced after, October 25, 2017, alleging a violation of Section 11090 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations (Industrial Welfare Commission (IWC) Order No. 9-2001) or any amended, successor, or replacement law, regulation, or IWC order.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Amendment [890. - 890.]

890.

The Legislature may amend this chapter by a statute passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered in the journal, four-fifths of the membership concurring, provided that the statute is consistent with, and furthers the purposes of, this chapter. No bill seeking to amend this chapter may be passed or become a statute unless the bill has been printed and distributed to the Members of the Legislature, and published on the Internet, in its final form, for at least 12 business days prior to its passage in either house of the Legislature.

(History: Added November 6, 2018, by initiative Proposition 11, Sec. 1.   Effective December 19, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. PRIVILEGES AND IMMUNITIES [920. - 1139.]



  CHAPTER 1. Contracts Against Public Policy [920. - 927.]

920.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, “promise” includes promise, undertaking, contract, or agreement, whether written or oral, express or implied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

921.

Every promise made after August 21, 1933, between any employee or prospective employee and his employer, prospective employer or any other person is contrary to public policy if either party thereto promises any of the following:

(a) To join or to remain a member of a labor organization or to join or remain a member of an employer organization,

(b) Not to join or not to remain a member of a labor organization or of an employer organization,

(c) To withdraw from an employment relation in the event that he joins or remains a member of a labor organization or of an employer organization.

Such promise shall not afford any basis for the granting of legal or equitable relief by any court against a party to such promise, or against any other persons who advise, urge, or induce, without fraud or violence or threat thereof, either party thereto to act in disregard of such promise.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

922.

Any person or agent or officer thereof who coerces or compels any person to enter into an agreement, written or verbal, not to join or become a member of any labor organization, as a condition of securing employment or continuing in the employment of any such person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

923.

In the interpretation and application of this chapter, the public policy of this State is declared as follows:

Negotiation of terms and conditions of labor should result from voluntary agreement between employer and employees. Governmental authority has permitted and encouraged employers to organize in the corporate and other forms of capital control. In dealing with such employers, the individual unorganized worker is helpless to exercise actual liberty of contract and to protect his freedom of labor, and thereby to obtain acceptable terms and conditions of employment. Therefore it is necessary that the individual workman have full freedom of association, self-organization, and designation of representatives of his own choosing, to negotiate the terms and conditions of his employment, and that he shall be free from the interference, restraint, or coercion of employers of labor, or their agents, in the designation of such representatives or in self-organization or in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

923.1.

(a) (1) All of the provisions of this section shall be liberally construed to ensure that all workers in California can effectively vindicate their fundamental rights to full freedom of association, self-organization, and designation of representatives of their own choosing, free from retaliation or intimidation by their employer.

(2) The rights described in this subdivision mean that a worker shall be allowed to engage in collective action, to organize, form, join, or assist labor organizations, and, when they choose to do so collectively through selected or designated bargaining representatives, to engage in effective and expeditious collective bargaining that results in a collective bargaining agreement addressing their
 terms and conditions of employment.

(3) The state and its political subdivisions shall not, directly or indirectly, deny, burden, or abridge the rights described in this subdivision except as necessary to serve a compelling state interest achieved by the least restrictive means.

(b) (1) A worker who meets the description in subparagraph (A) or (B) may petition the Public Employment Relations Board to protect and enforce the rights described in subdivision (a).

(A) The worker is employed in a position that is, or would have been, subject to the National Labor Relations Act as of January 1, 2025, but they lose coverage under the National Labor Relations Act because the National Labor Relations Act is repealed, narrowed, or its enforcement enjoined in a case involving that worker, whether through
 legislative, executive, or judicial action, and the worker is not otherwise covered by the federal Railway Labor Act (45 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.) or by any law that subjects them to the jurisdiction of the Public Employment Relations Board, aside from this section, or the Agricultural Labor Relations Board.

(B) The worker is employed in a position which is or would be subject to the National Labor Relations Act as of January 1, 2025, but the National Labor Relations Board has expressly or impliedly ceded jurisdiction. The National Labor Relations Board will be deemed to have ceded jurisdiction to the states if any of the following conditions are satisfied as of January 1, 2026:

(i) For cases where a certification of the results of an election, including a certification of representative, or administrative law judge decision has been issued, or where challenges or objections to a
 representation election are pending before the National Labor Relations Board, when there is a lack of a quorum of the National Labor Relations Board, or when the National Labor Relations Board has lost its independence as a result of the Supreme Court finding that National Labor Relations Board members are unconstitutionally protected from removal or when the continued processing of a case is enjoined by a court due to constitutional challenges to the board’s structure or authority.

(ii) For cases where no certification or complaint or decision has been issued, when there are processing delays resulting in the worker’s case remaining pending before a regional director for more than six months without the issuance of a complaint or certification of an election, or remaining pending more than six months after a complaint has been issued without the issuance of a decision by an administrative law judge or without the issuance of a decision about
 the certification by the National Labor Relations Board.

(iii) For cases where a certification of the results of an election, including a certification of representative, or other reviewable order has been issued by the regional director or administrative law judge, when there are processing delays resulting in failure by the National Labor Relations Board to accept or decline review or grant special permission to appeal for more than six months following the filing of a request for review or for special permission to appeal.

(iv) For cases on review or exceptions before the National Labor Relations Board, when there are processing delays resulting in the case remaining pending for more than 12 months without the issuance of a final decision.

(2) If the Public Employment Relations Board determines that the conditions
 described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) no longer apply, the Public Employment Relations Board shall retain jurisdiction over pending matters and shall maintain jurisdiction from that point forward unless ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction to cede its jurisdiction.

(3) This subdivision shall not affect the rights of workers under other federal or state statutes.

(c) A worker who meets the conditions of subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or their chosen representative may do any of the following:

(1) Petition the Public Employment Relations Board to process any representation petition previously filed with the National Labor Relations Board.

(2) Petition the Public Employment Relations Board to promptly
 certify an exclusive bargaining representative that has previously been certified by another state or federal agency, or that has been selected by the majority of employees in an appropriate bargaining unit through an election, through other legal processes recognized by the Public Employment Relations Board or the National Labor Relations Board at that time the selection is made, or through a written designation. All existing terms and conditions of employment between a certified exclusive bargaining representative and an employer shall remain in full force and effect during bargaining following certification.

(3) Petition the Public Employment Relations Board to decide unfair labor practice cases on the following timeline:

(A) As of January 1, 2026, cases involving an employer of more than 500 employees and alleging a refusal to bargain, a refusal to recognize, or a refusal to
 give effect to an election certification, or cases involving a unilateral withdrawal of recognition from the worker’s chosen representative by an employer of any size, and associated violations that are necessary to decide the bargaining or recognition violation. These shall be considered Category 1 cases and shall take priority over any Category 2 or 3 cases.

(B) As of July 1, 2026, cases involving an employer of any size and alleging a refusal to bargain, a refusal to recognize, or a refusal to give effect to an election certification, and associated violations that are necessary to decide the bargaining or recognition violation. These shall be considered Category 1 cases and shall take priority over any Category 2 or 3 cases.

(C) As of January 1, 2027, cases alleging that an employer has failed to bargain in good faith if the parties have been engaged in bargaining for a
 collective bargaining agreement for over six months without reaching agreement, and associated violations. These shall be considered Category 2 cases and shall take priority over any Category 3 cases.

(D) If the Public Employment Relations Board determines that it has insufficient resources to process all cases filed under subparagraphs (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), or that doing so would prevent it from meeting statutory deadlines applicable prior to July 1, 2026, the Public Employment Relations Board shall process and prioritize cases in accordance with the following before processing any Category 3 cases:

(i) Cases involving employers employing more than 500 workers affected or potentially affected by the case shall be priority 1.

(ii) Cases involving an active union organizing campaign and
 allegations of loss of employment shall be priority 2.

(iii) Cases involving an active union organizing campaign and allegations not involving loss of employment shall be priority 3.

(iv) Cases that have been pending before the NLRB for more than 18 months shall be priority 4.

(v) All other Category 1 or 2 cases shall be priority 5.

(E) As of January 1, 2027, all other cases not included in paragraph (A), (B), or (C) shall be considered Category 3 cases. The Public Employment Relations Board shall prioritize and process Category 3 cases, to the extent feasible, in accordance with the following:

(i) Cases involving allegations arising from an organizing campaign shall be priority 1.

(ii) Cases involving allegations of loss of employment shall be priority 2.

(iii) Cases involving allegations of retaliation for union activities or the exercise of rights under the NLRA or this section, not involving loss of employment, shall be priority 3.

(iv) Cases involving allegations of violation of Weingarten rights, failure to respond to union information requests, or unilateral changes by an employer engaging in first contract negotiation shall be priority 4.
